Illinois, session 104th, SB2823.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)7    Sec. 2MMMM. Social media; report fraudulent activity.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Account holder" means a resident of this State who has a 10social media account on a social media platform.11    "Social media account" means a profile created by a person 12on a social media platform that contains personal information, 13including name, phone number, email, or other identifying 14information. "Social media account" includes a profile created 15by a person that only contains pictures or videos that the 16person owns and shares.17    "Social media company" means a person, business, or other 18legal entity and its agents, assignees, or representatives 19that provides or operates a social media platform with at 20least 5,000,000 users.21    "Social media platform" means a public or semi-public 22Internet-based service or application with users in this 23State, that:  SB2823- 2 -LRB104 16967 SPS 30381 b1        (1) allows users to construct a public or semi-public 2    social media account for the purposes of using the 3    platform, populate a list of other users with whom the 4    user shares a social connection through the platform, and 5    post content viewable by other users of the platform; and6        (2) is designed to connect users within the platform 7    to facilitate social interactions, except that a service 8    or application that provides email or direct messaging 9    services shall not be considered a social media platform 10    solely based on the existence of that functionality.11    "Social media platform" does not include an Internet-based 12service or application for which interactions between users 13are solely related to the provision of direct messages, 14commercial and financial transactions, peer-to-peer payments, 15consumer engagement around products, product reviews, sellers, 16services, events, or places, or any combination thereof.17    (b) A social media company shall make available to account 18holders a 24-hour toll-free telephone number through which an 19account holder may contact a live customer service 20representative of the social media company to report 21fraudulent activity on an account holder's social media 22account, including, but not limited to, unauthorized access.23    (c) A social media company shall include the telephone 24number made available in accordance with subsection (b) and an 25explanation of the purpose of the telephone number in any 26email notification concerning account security sent to an   SB2823- 3 -LRB104 16967 SPS 30381 b1account holder and post the telephone number and explanation 2in a prominent location on the homepage or help page of the 3social media platform.4    (d) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 5practice within the meaning of this Act.